Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.900

Liberal construction.

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this chapter, but the same shall be liberally construed for the purpose of carrying out the objects for which this chapter is intended.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.900. Prior: 1890 p 224 s 8.]